test/src/gt-norm-yamls/N-С_А2-яблоко_gt-norm.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup
Tests:
# todo:
# Proofread the gold standard (below)
# Then: run analyser, then correct. 

  Noun - яблоко M anim : # Noun - full paradigm
      яблоко+N+Neu+Sg+Nom: я́блоко
      яблоко+N+Neu+Sg+Acc: я́блоко
      яблоко+N+Neu+Sg+Gen: я́блока
      яблоко+N+Neu+Sg+Loc: я́блоке
      яблоко+N+Neu+Sg+Dat: я́блоку
      яблоко+N+Neu+Sg+Ins: я́блоком
      яблоко+N+Neu+Pl+Nom: я́блоки
      яблоко+N+Neu+Pl+Acc+Inan: я́блоки
      яблоко+N+Neu+Pl+Gen: я́блок
      яблоко+N+Neu+Pl+Loc: я́блоках
      яблоко+N+Neu+Pl+Dat: я́блокам
      яблоко+N+Neu+Pl+Ins: я́блоками
